Massachusetts, session 194th, S2141.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
(a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General Laws, 
chapter 312 of the acts of 1996 or any other general or special law to the contrary, the 
commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may release or amend certain use 
restrictions held by the commonwealth for municipal recreational purposes and public safety and 
other municipal building purposes on all or a portion of certain parcels of land on Payson road in 
the town of Foxborough. The use restrictions are described in deeds  recorded in the Norfolk 
registry of deeds in book 20013, page 470 and book 13416, page 205 and shown as parcels H-1 
and H-2 on a plan entitled “Approval Not Required Subdivision Plan”, prepared for Foxborough 
State Hospital, Foxborough, MA, dated December 10, 1998 and prepared by Rizzo Associates 
Inc., recorded in the Norfolk registry of deeds in plan book 465, page 256. The consideration for 

of 2 11 the release or amendment of the use restrictions shall be a use restriction for housing purposes, 
which may include, but shall not be limited to, market rate housing and senior housing purposes; 
provided, however, that the town of Foxborough may subsequently convey all or a portion of the 
parcels to a third party for housing purposes. 
(b) The town of Foxborough shall be responsible for all costs and expenses of any 
transaction authorized pursuant to subsection (a) as determined by the commissioner of capital 
asset management and maintenance including, but not limited to, the costs of any engineering, 
surveys, appraisals, title examinations and recording fees.